Indiana, session 2026, HB1128.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-9.5-2-1.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1.5. "Active duty" has the
meaning set forth in IC 22-9-9-1.
SECTION 2. IC 22-9.5-2-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. "Source of income" means
funds received from:
(1) a housing voucher provided under the Section 8 program
of the federal Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. 1437f); or
(2) another similar form of federal, state, or local housing
assistance provided to an individual or a family or provided
to a housing owner on behalf of an individual or a family,
including:
(A) rental vouchers;
(B) rental assistance; or
(C) rental subsidies from nongovernmental organizations.
2026 IN 1128—LS 6576/DI 137


SECTION 3. IC 22-9.5-2-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14. "Veteran" has the meaning set forth in
IC 22-9-1-3.
SECTION 4. IC 22-9.5-5-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) A person may not
refuse to sell or to rent after the making of a bona fide offer, refuse to
negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or
deny a dwelling to any person because of race, color, religion, sex,
familial status, disability, or national origin, source of income, active
duty status, or veteran status.
(b) A person may not discriminate against any person in the terms,
conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in providing
services or facilities in connection with the sale or rental of a dwelling,
because of race, color, religion, sex, familial status, disability, or
national origin, source of income, active duty status, or veteran
status.
(c) This section does not prohibit discrimination against a person
because the person has been convicted under federal law or the law of
any state of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled
substance.
SECTION 5. IC 22-9.5-5-2 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. A person may not
make, print, or publish or cause to be made, printed, or published any
notice, statement, or advertisement with respect to the sale or rental of
a dwelling that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination
based on race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national
origin, source of income, active duty status, or veteran status, or an
intention to make such a preference, limitation, or discrimination.
SECTION 6. IC 22-9.5-5-3 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. A person may not
represent to any person because of race, color, religion, sex, disability,
familial status, or national origin, source of income, active duty
status, or veteran status that a dwelling is not available for inspection
for sale or rental when the dwelling is available for inspection.
SECTION 7. IC 22-9.5-5-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. A person may not,
for profit, induce or attempt to induce a person to sell or rent a dwelling
by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into a
neighborhood of a person of a particular race, color, religion, sex,
disability, familial status, or national origin, source of income, active
duty status, or veteran status.
2026 IN 1128—LS 6576/DI 137


SECTION 8. IC 22-9.5-5-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) As used in this
section, "residential real estate related transaction" means the
following:
(1) Making or purchasing loans or providing other financial
assistance:
(A) to purchase, construct, improve, repair, or maintain a
dwelling; or
(B) to secure residential real estate.
(2) Selling, brokering, or appraising residential real property.
(b) A person whose business includes engaging in residential real
estate related transactions may not discriminate against a person in
making a real estate related transaction available or in the terms or
conditions of a real estate related transaction because of race, color,
religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national origin, source of
income, active duty status, or veteran status.
SECTION 9. IC 22-9.5-5-7 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. A person may not
deny any person access to, or membership or participation in, a
multiple-listing service, real estate brokers' organization or other
service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or
renting dwellings, or discriminate against a person in the terms or
conditions of access, membership, or participation in such an
organization, service, or facility because of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, familial status, or national origin, source of income, active
duty status, or veteran status.
SECTION 10. IC 22-9.5-10-1 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. A person commits
a Class A misdemeanor if the person, whether or not acting under color
of law, by force or threat of force intentionally intimidates or interferes
with or attempts to intimidate or interfere with a person:
(1) because of the person's race, color, religion, sex, disability,
familial status, or national origin, source of income, active duty
status, or veteran status and because the person is or has been
selling, purchasing, renting, financing, occupying, or contracting
or negotiating for the sale, purchase, rental, financing, or
occupation of any dwelling, or applying for or participating in a
service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling
or renting dwellings; or
(2) because the person is or has been, or to intimidate the person
from:
(A) participating, without discrimination because of race,
2026 IN 1128—LS 6576/DI 137


color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national
origin, source of income, active duty status, or veteran
status, in an activity, a service, an organization, or a facility
described in subdivision (1);
(B) affording another person opportunity or protection to
participate in an activity, a service, an organization, or a
facility described in subdivision (1); or
(C) lawfully aiding or encouraging other persons to participate,
without discrimination because of race, color, religion, sex,
disability, familial status, or national origin, source of income,
active duty status, or veteran status, in an activity, a service,
an organization, or a facility described in subdivision (1).
2026 IN 1128—LS 6576/DI 137